Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 State Highway System
32-6-75.1.
Roadside Enhancement and Beautification Council; membership; purpose; compensation.

The Governor shall appoint a Roadside Enhancement and Beautification Council composed of 12 members. The council shall include the chairperson of the Senate Transportation Committee; the chairperson of the House Transportation Committee; a member from the Georgia Conservancy; a member from the Garden Clubs of Georgia, Inc.; a member of the faculty of the School of Environmental Design at the University of Georgia; a member from the Sierra Club; a member from the Georgia Wildlife Federation; four members of the Outdoor Advertising Association of Georgia, Inc.; and the deputy commissioner of the Georgia Department of Transportation or the designee thereof. The commissioner shall submit recommendations to the Governor for purposes of selecting members to the council.

Terms of those members representing the Georgia Conservancy, the Garden Clubs of Georgia, and the School of Environmental Design and of two of those members representing the Outdoor Advertising Association shall expire on January 1, 2001, and quadrennially thereafter. Such members may be appointed to successive terms.

Terms of those members representing the Sierra Club and the Georgia Wildlife Federation and of two of those members representing the Outdoor Advertising Association shall expire on January 1, 2003, and quadrennially thereafter. Such members may be appointed to successive terms.

A landscape architect employed by the department and designated by the commissioner shall serve as an adviser to the council.

The council shall aid the commissioner in formulating policies and discussing problems related to the administration of this article. In addition, the council shall:

Review, comment upon, and make recommendations to the commissioner on the standards and policies to be used in the trimming and removal of vegetation on state rights of way in front of legally erected and maintained outdoor advertising signs;

Make recommendations to the department regarding standards for vegetation removal and landscape and maintenance plans submitted by permittees including without limitation the use of viewing zones under Code Section 32-6-75.3;

Review the performance of permittees holding current tree and vegetation trimming permits issued under Code Section 32-6-75.3 for compliance with the requirements of such permits including without limitation the implementation of landscaping plans;

Encourage the contribution of funds from appropriate sources to support roadside enhancement and beautification;

Submit to the commissioner annually not later than 30 days after the date of its fourth quarter meeting a written report of findings based upon its reviews of permittees’ performances and recommendations including without limitation any recommendations for expenditures for roadside enhancement and beautification; and

Perform such other functions as may be specified for the council by the department.

The council shall have full and complete access to all department records necessary for the performance of its duties.

The council shall meet to elect a chairperson and vice chairperson and to establish the rules governing its operation. The advisory council shall meet at the call of the chairperson and shall meet not less than quarterly.

Each councilmember shall be compensated at a rate per day the same as that rate per day provided by law for members of the General Assembly serving on interim committees and shall be reimbursed for any necessary expenses; provided, however, that any full-time state employee on the council shall draw no compensation but shall receive necessary expenses. The commissioner is authorized to pay such compensation and expenses from department funds.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-934.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 955, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1313, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32.

Cross references.

Roadside enhancement and beautification fund, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IX, Para. VI.

Forest resources and other plant life generally, T. 12, C. 6.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to highways, bridges, and ferries, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 136 (1998).

For article, “Highways, Bridges, and Ferries:
Regulation of Maintenance and Use of Public Roads Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 91 (2011).

32-6-75.2.
Roadside Enhancement and Beautification Fund; dedication of certain revenues.

There is established a special fund to be known as the “Roadside Enhancement and Beautification Fund.” This fund shall consist of all moneys collected under Code Section 32-6-75.3, any appropriations by the General Assembly to the fund, revenues derived from the sale of any special and distinctive wildflower motor vehicle license plates issued pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (l) of Code Section 40-2-86, any contributions to the fund from any other source, and all interest thereon. All moneys collected under Code Section 32-6-75.3 and fees for any special and distinctive wildflower motor vehicle license plates shall be paid into the fund. All balances in the fund shall be deposited in an interest-bearing account identifying the fund and shall be carried forward each year so that no part thereof may be deposited in the general treasury. The department shall administer the fund and expend moneys held in the fund in furtherance of roadside enhancement and beautification projects along public roads in this state and administration of the tree and vegetation trimming permit program under Code Section 32-6-75.3. In addition to the foregoing, the department may, without limitation, promote and solicit voluntary contributions, promote the sale of motor vehicle license tags authorized under paragraph (5) of subsection (l) of Code Section 40-2-86, and develop any fund raising or other promotional techniques deemed appropriate by the department. Contributions to the fund shall be deemed supplemental to and shall in no way supplant funding that would otherwise be appropriated for these purposes. The department shall prepare, by February 1 of each year, an accounting of the funds received and expended from the fund. The report shall be made available to the members of the State Transportation Board, the Senate Transportation Committee, the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives, and to members of the public on request.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-934.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 955, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1313, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1021, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-60/HB 1055.

Cross references.

Roadside enhancement and beautification fund, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IX, Para. VI.

Editor’s notes.

The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 1998, p. 1688) which authorized provisions of this Code section was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the 1998 November general election.

32-6-75.3.
Permits for trimming or removal of trees or vegetation in state right of way which obstruct view of outdoor advertising; removal of signs with lapsed permits.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Removal” or “removed” means the elimination of trees or other vegetation from a viewing zone.

“Target view zone” means an area of the viewing zone extending from the sign to the roadway to which the sign is permitted which shall be angled as requested by the applicant to maximize the visibility of the sign to passing motorists but not to exceed:

Two-hundred and fifty feet along the right of way fence or boundary; and

Three-hundred and fifty feet along the pavement edge, to include any emergency lane or paved shoulder.

“Trimming” or “trimmed” means the pruning of excess limbs or branches from trees or other vegetation which are not removed from a viewing zone.

“Viewing zone” means a continuous 500 foot horizontal distance parallel to a state right of way and adjacent to or otherwise within the line of sight of an outdoor advertising sign.

The General Assembly finds and declares that outdoor advertising provides a substantial service and benefit to Georgia and Georgia’s citizens as well as the traveling public. Therefore, the General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that provisions be made for the visibility of outdoor advertising signs legally erected and maintained along the highways in this state to provide information regarding places offering lodging, food, motor vehicle fuels and lubricants, motor service and repairs, or any other services or products available to the general public. Recognizing, however, that the beautification of this state and the health of its environment are absolutely essential and equally as important to the traveling public, the General Assembly finds and declares that these needs must be balanced.

So as to promote these objectives and in accordance with the provisions of this Code section, the commissioner shall provide by rule or regulation for the issuance and annual renewal of permits for the trimming and removal of trees and other vegetation on the state rights of way within viewing zones with respect to outdoor advertising signs legally erected and legally maintained adjacent to said rights of way. Such rules and regulations shall include, without limitation, standards for survival of vegetation trimmed or planted.

So as to ensure that no vegetation maintenance permits are issued for the purpose of creating new outdoor advertising signs, no owner of outdoor advertising signs permitted or assigned a working number by the department after December 31, 2010, or such owner’s agent, shall be eligible to make application for vegetation maintenance for a period of five years from the date a new sign is permitted.

Application for a tree or vegetation trimming or removal permit and the annual renewal thereof shall be made upon the forms prescribed and provided by the department and shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department’s rules and regulations.

An application fee shall accompany the application for each vegetation maintenance permit, and both the application and fee shall be submitted to the department. There shall be an annual renewal of the permit for activities in the original scope of the permit. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations setting forth the application fees and renewal fees. Such application and renewal fees shall be established by the department in reasonable amounts in order to fully recover the costs of administering the vegetation maintenance program.

The department shall evaluate each application for a permit under this Code section and require as a condition of granting any permit under this Code section that the value of the landscaping to be either provided or paid for by the applicant is not less than the department’s appraised value of the benefit to be conferred by the state upon the applicant by allowing the trimming or removing of trees or other vegetation as requested, which shall be the value of the trees or vegetation to be trimmed or removed; provided, however, that a permit may be granted to an otherwise qualified applicant in a case where the value of the landscaping to be either provided or paid for by the applicant is less than the department’s appraised value of the trees or other vegetation to be trimmed or removed if, in addition, the applicant pays to the department an amount equal to the amount of the difference between the value of the landscaping to be either provided or paid for by the applicant and the department’s appraised value of the trees or other vegetation to be trimmed or removed.

Any measurement of vegetation to be removed for valuation purposes shall be made at diameter breast height as shown in the section entitled “Height of Measurement” in the Guide for Plant Appraisal (9th Edition) as published by the International Society of Arboriculture. Based on the substantial benefit to the state where dead or diseased trees are removed from the right of way, and the negligible value of dead or diseased trees, such vegetation shall not be measured or valued in determining the appraised value. Trees shall be only deemed dead or diseased if listed as such in the report of a certified forester or arborist, subject to review and approval by the department. Upon receipt of a properly completed application, the department shall, within 60 days, issue the permit for vegetation maintenance.

For purposes of this paragraph, the term “historic tree” means a tree or group of trees that are reasonably determined by the department to be:

Identified by a unit of government to recognize an individual or group;

Located at the site of a historic event and significantly impact an individual’s perception of the event;

Dated to the time of a historic event at the location of the tree, as identified by a unit of government; or

Confirmed as the progeny of a tree that meets any of the criteria contained in this division.

For purposes of this paragraph, the term “landmark tree” means a tree or group of trees that:

Have been planted and maintained for educational purposes for more than 75 years;

Were planted as a memorial to an individual, group, event, or cause and are more than 75 years old; or

Symbolize a historically significant individual, place, event, or contribution, as recognized by a unit of government prior to July 1, 2010.

For purposes of this paragraph, the term “specimen tree” means a hardwood tree or group of hardwood trees that is determined to be in excess of 75 years of age as determined by a registered forester or arborist.

The applicant shall be allowed to remove all trees and vegetation from the target view zone so long as the sign was permitted or assigned a working number by the department on or before December 31, 2010. Vegetation removal shall be prohibited in all areas of the viewing zone outside of the target view zone except that portions of vegetation, such as tree limbs, which extend into the target view zone from outside the target view zone may be trimmed as necessary to preserve the clear target view zone. The only vegetation which cannot be removed from the target view zone pursuant to this paragraph shall be landmark trees, historic trees, and specimen trees, as defined in subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph, and any tree planted as part of a permitted local, state, or federal government beautification project. After July 1, 2011, however, no beautification project in this state shall include the planting of trees in the right of way within 500 feet of an outdoor advertising sign such that the visibility of a permitted outdoor advertising sign is obscured or could later be obscured by the growth of such vegetation.

Pruning or trimming of trees under a permit shall conform to industry standards as defined by the National Arborist Association, International Society of Arboriculture or ANSI A300 pruning standards as of January 1, 2011, or such later edition as may be adopted by rule or regulation of the department.

An applicant’s record of conduct regarding disturbance of trees or other vegetation on state rights of way shall be considered by the department as part of the evaluation process for any permit or permit renewal application.

Prior to approving any permit application to remove allegedly diseased trees, the department shall verify that such trees are in fact diseased. Such determination shall be made by the department’s landscape architect.

A performance bond in an amount adequate for the requirements of the permit as determined by the department shall be required of each permittee.

No trees or other vegetation on state rights of way shall be trimmed, killed, or removed by any person other than in accordance with a permit issued under this Code section by any person other than the department or an authorized agent or contractor thereof.

No outdoor advertising sign to which a permit under this Code section is applicable shall be unused for advertising for a period of six consecutive months or more.

On and after July 1, 1999, no outdoor advertising sign to which a permit under this Code section is applicable shall be maintained in such a condition of disrepair as to be unusable for advertising.

In cases where the department has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this subsection has been committed by any person, the procedures provided under Code Section 32-6-95 shall apply the same as in cases wherein the department believes that a sign is being maintained in violation of this part.

Following notice, hearing, and a finding that a person has committed a violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a civil fine of not less than $10,000.00 nor more than $20,000.00, and restitution in an amount equal to the appraised value of the trees or vegetation, or both, which were unlawfully trimmed or removed, shall be imposed on such person.

Following notice, hearing, and a finding that a permittee under this Code section has committed a violation of paragraph (2) of this subsection, an order directing the removal of such unused sign, at the expense of the permittee, shall be issued.

Following notice, hearing, and a finding that a permittee under this Code section has committed a violation of paragraph (3) of this subsection, an order directing the removal of such unusable sign shall be issued.

The department or its authorized agents shall be authorized to enter upon private lands and disassemble and remove signs without civil or criminal liability therefor pursuant to an order issued in accordance with this paragraph and as provided by Code Section 32-6-96 for disassembly and removal of illegal outdoor advertising signs.

In order to obtain a vegetation maintenance permit for signs which exceed 75 feet in height, as measured from the base of the sign or crown of the adjacent roadway to which the sign is permitted, whichever is higher, the owner of the sign shall agree to reduce the sign to 75 feet in height or less, as measured from the base of the sign or crown of the adjacent roadway to which the sign is permitted, whichever is higher, unless lowering is precluded by local government code or regulation. Work to lower the sign shall be concluded within 60 days of completion of the vegetation removal. If the terms of the work plan are not complied with and all work satisfactorily completed within the allowed time, the performance bond shall be forfeited, and the department shall be authorized to collect the bond and lower the sign. Upon completion of any project which reduces sign height by use of a new support mechanism, such as a new pole, the sign owner shall provide the department with a written footer inspection from the applicable local government or a professional engineer prior to the release of the bond.

The department shall have the right to refuse to issue any vegetation permits to any person, firm, or entity which the department determines is maintaining or is allowing to be maintained any abandoned sign or signs, until all such abandoned signs are removed or brought into compliance with the provisions of this Code section. For purposes of this subsection, the term “abandoned sign” means any sign adjacent to a state-controlled route that has not contained a message for six consecutive months and which has not had a message displayed within 30 days after receipt of notice by certified mail from the department. The addition of a “for rent” panel or a phone number shall not qualify as a message for purposes of this subsection, but self-promotional copy covering at least one entire sign face or advertising copy benefiting charitable, nonprofit, religious, or other noncommercial groups shall qualify as a message.

The department shall have the right to refuse to issue any vegetation permits to any person, firm, or entity which the department determines is maintaining or is allowing to be maintained in their inventory of signs in this state any sign which depicts any material which is obscene as such term is defined in Code Section 16-12-80, or material that is in conflict with the applicable local government’s obscenity ordinance. Upon conviction of depiction of any material as obscene the person, firm, or entity shall be punishable by a fine of not less than $5,000.00 for the first conviction and $10,000.00 for any subsequent conviction and shall also be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

The removal of signs with lapsed outdoor advertising permits is of benefit to this state but is often too costly for the department to undertake. In order to encourage the removal of such signs and permitted signs that do not conform to the state’s current requirements for outdoor advertising signs without the expenditure of state funds, a credit which may be used as an offset toward the total appraised value of the vegetation to be removed in accordance with a vegetation maintenance permit shall be awarded for each qualifying sign removal as follows:

On or before March 1, 2012, the department shall prepare a list of signs which once held a valid outdoor advertising permit but for which the permit has been allowed to lapse. Notification of a sign’s inclusion on such list shall be sent to the last known address for the sign’s owner as listed on department records and to any other person or entity which the department reasonably finds to have an interest in such sign. Within 30 days of receipt of such notice or 60 days of publication of the list, whichever comes later, any person or entity claiming to be the owner of a sign that they do not believe has been properly included on the list shall be allowed to submit written notice to the department of their objection. Such objection may include a statement of the relevant facts and any supporting documents. On or before July 1, 2012, the department shall publish the final list. Signs which are the subject of any current objections, administrative appeals, or legal disputes shall not be included on such list. This list shall be updated annually and provided to the chairpersons of the House and Senate Transportation Committees on or before the first day of March;

The department shall, on or before January 1, 2012, prepare a schedule or formula to determine the credit to be received for the removal of lapsed-permit signs and permitted nonconforming outdoor advertising signs. Such schedule shall provide a valuation of the credit based on four factors: material used in sign structure, height of sign, size of sign, and terrain and topography. The department shall also prepare a form to be submitted by any person or entity seeking a credit under this subsection. Such form shall require a description of the material used in the sign structure, the height of the sign, the size of the sign, and the terrain and topography where the sign is situated and a calculation of the anticipated credit in accordance with the department’s schedule or formula;

At such time as any lapsed-permit sign from the department’s updated list or a nonconforming outdoor advertising sign is removed, the person or entity responsible for such removal shall submit to the department the completed removal form and photographic evidence of the removal. For purposes of this subsection, the term “removal” means removal of all structural elements above ground level; removal of footers or foundation elements shall not be required. Within 60 days of such submission, the department shall certify and return the form. No credit shall be allowed for the removal of a lapsed-permit sign by the owner of such sign. The certified form shall serve as a credit voucher. Credit vouchers may be transferred to another party via notarized statement signed by both parties;

Where a lapsed-permit sign from the department’s updated list or a nonconforming sign is to be removed in conjunction with a specific application for a vegetation maintenance permit, the sign to be removed shall be designated by department permit number. If the vegetation permit is approved, then the sign designated for removal shall be removed at least 15 days prior to initiation of work pursuant to the vegetation permit. Removal shall be deemed complete when the removal form and photographic evidence of the removal are submitted to the department. The sign designated for removal need not be owned by the vegetation permit applicant. As such, nothing herein shall be interpreted to require that the removed sign be owned or controlled by the vegetation permit applicant. All work hereunder shall be performed by licensed and bonded entities or individuals, where required by law, and the department shall not be liable for the actions of any nondepartment personnel; and

A credit voucher may be used by an applicant for a vegetation maintenance permit as an offset against the total appraised value of the vegetation to be removed on a dollar-for-dollar basis, except that the total payment shall not be reduced below $4,000.00. Any unused portion of a credit voucher may be used in conjunction with a subsequent vegetation maintenance application.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall render any sign existing on July 1, 2011, nonconforming. Nothing in this Code section shall supersede any applicable local rules or ordinances. The department shall not deny an applicant a vegetation maintenance permit for complying with applicable local rules or ordinances.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-934.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 955, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1313, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 601, § 2/HB 179; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 32/HB 942.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 601, § 4/HB 179, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The Department of Transportation shall have 120 days from the effective date to promulgate any forms or policies necessary to implement this Act.
Those applications submitted before any necessary forms and policies are in place shall be processed in accordance with the regulations in place prior to the effective date.
Those holding vegetation maintenance permits or renewals issued at any time prior to the promulgation of the necessary forms and policies shall, upon written request to the department, be able to trim or remove vegetation in accordance with the terms of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 91 (2011).

For article, “Highways, Bridges, and Ferries:
Regulation of Maintenance and Use of Public Roads Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 91 (2011).

32-6-76.
Restrictions on directional signs generally.

Paragraphs (1) through (7), (9), (10), (13) through (17), (19), and (20) of subsection (a) of Code Section 32-6-75 are applicable to directional signs authorized by paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-6-72 and paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-6-73; and, in addition thereto, no directional sign shall be erected or maintained which:

Is located in a rest area, parkland, or scenic area;

Contains an area, to be measured by the smallest square, rectangle, triangle, circle, or combination thereof, which encompasses the entire sign, in excess of 150 square feet or exceeding 20 feet in height or 20 feet in length, inclusive of any border and trim but excluding the base, apron, supports, and other structural members;

Contains, includes, or is illuminated by any flashing, intermittent, or moving light or lights;

Is located adjacent to an interstate highway and which is within 2,000 feet of an interchange or intersection at grade. The foregoing 2,000 foot zone shall be measured along the interstate highway from the point at which the pavement commences or ceases to widen at exits from or entrances to the main traveled way;

Is located within 2,000 feet of a rest area, parkland, or scenic area;

Is located within one mile of another directional sign facing the same direction of travel;

Creates the existence of more than three directional signs pertaining to the same activity facing the same direction of travel along a single route approaching the activity;

Is located along the interstate system at a point more than 75 air miles from the advertised activity;

Is located along the primary system at a point more than 50 air miles from the advertised activity;

Contains information other than the identification of the attraction or activity and directional information useful to the traveler in locating the attraction, such as mileage, route numbers, or exit numbers. The sign shall not contain descriptive words, phrases, or pictorial or photographic representations of the activity or its environs; or

Advertises privately owned activities or attractions other than natural phenomena, scenic attractions, historic, educational, cultural, scientific, and religious sites, agricultural tourist attractions designated by the Department of Agriculture, and outdoor recreational areas and which are nationally or regionally known and are of outstanding interest to the traveling public, as determined by the State Transportation Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-917, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, §§ 28A, 29; Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1052, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 314, § 2/HB 1088.

Cross references.

Directional road signs to direct passing traffic to agricultural tourist attractions, §

50-7-70

.

32-6-77.
Exceptions to spacing limitations contained in Code Sections 32-6-75 and 32-6-76.

Signs which are authorized by and erected or maintained pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of Code Section 32-6-72 or paragraph (2) or (3) of Code Section 32-6-73 or which are official signs or notices, as defined in paragraph (13) of Code Section 32-6-71, and signs which are not lawfully erected or maintained shall not be counted nor shall measurements be made therefrom for the purpose of determining the spacing limitations prescribed in Code Sections 32-6-75 and 32-6-76.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 6; Code 1933, § 95A-918, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 4.

32-6-78.
Restrictions on public service signs.

No public service sign authorized by paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-6-72 or paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-6-73 shall be erected or maintained which:

Is attached to a school bus shelter, the construction of which is not authorized by state law or local ordinance;

Is attached to a school bus shelter located at a place not approved by the governmental agency having jurisdiction of the highway along which said shelter is located;

Contains an area, to be measured by the smallest square, rectangle, triangle, circle, or combination thereof, which encompasses the entire sign, in excess of 32 square feet; or

Creates a situation in which there is more than one sign facing in any one direction on each shelter.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 7; Code 1933, § 95A-919, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 5.

32-6-79.
Permits for nonconforming signs; right of department to refuse to issue additional permits to persons maintaining illegal sign; appeal from department’s decision.

On and after October 6, 1971, no person, firm, or corporation shall erect or maintain a sign authorized by paragraph (1), (4), or (5) of Code Section 32-6-72 without a permit issued by the department.

On and after January 1, 1972, no person, firm, or corporation shall maintain a sign lawfully in existence on October 6, 1971, and which is authorized by this part without a permit issued by the department.

On and after March 4, 1977, no person, firm, or corporation shall erect or maintain a sign authorized by paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-6-73 without a permit issued by the department.

On and after July 1, 1977, no person, firm, or corporation shall maintain a sign lawfully in existence on March 4, 1977, and which sign is authorized by paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-6-73 without a permit issued by the department.

It is the intent of this Code section to provide for a system of cataloguing and registering nonconforming signs in order to administer this part more adequately. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this Code section requiring the registration of nonconforming signs; and such rules and regulations shall inform the applicants of the procedures to make application for nonconforming sign permits.

From March 24, 1980, all persons, firms, or corporations who own nonconforming signs as defined in paragraph (12) of Code Section 32-6-71 shall have a period of one year during which time they shall be required to file application for nonconforming sign permits. Applications for nonconforming sign permits shall be made upon forms prescribed and provided by the department and shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department’s rules and regulations. If the applicant files the application for a nonconforming sign permit upon the forms and according to the procedures provided by the department and within the specified time period of one year, the application shall be considered to have been filed timely and properly. An application fee of $50.00 shall accompany the application for each nonconforming sign and both the application and the fee shall be submitted to the department. The money received from permit fees shall be used to help defray the expenses of administering this part, Code Section 48-2-17 to the contrary notwithstanding. The department shall have a period of two years from March 24, 1980, to process applications for nonconforming sign permits. If at the end of this two-year period the department has failed to approve or deny a proper and completed application, it shall be conclusively presumed for all purposes that the sign can be permitted as a nonconforming sign and the department must issue the permit within a reasonable time. Should the department deny the application for a nonconforming sign permit, the applicant may seek relief in accordance with Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-18. In cases where the applicant fails to exhaust the procedures prescribed by Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-18, the department’s denial of the permit request will be final and the sign shall then become an illegal sign as defined by paragraph (6) of Code Section 32-6-71 and shall be subject to removal under the terms of this part.

If the owner of the nonconforming sign fails to apply properly for a permit, it is conclusively presumed that the sign has been abandoned, and the sign shall then become an illegal sign as defined by paragraph (6) of Code Section 32-6-71, and the sign shall be subject to removal under the terms of this part.

On or after March 24, 1980, the department shall have the right to refuse to issue any additional permits to any person, firm, or corporation who the department determines is maintaining or is allowing to be maintained an illegal sign or signs as defined by paragraph (6) of Code Section 32-6-71 on the interstate or primary highways in this state until such illegal sign or signs are removed. The refusal by the department to issue any additional permits shall not be considered a final denial. If the applicant does not believe the sign or signs designated by the department are illegal, the applicant may seek relief in accordance with Code Sections 50-13-13 through 50-13-18. Unless, within 120 days after the applicant has requested an administrative hearing, the department has issued a final agency decision that the sign or signs are illegal, the department may no longer refuse to issue permits because of a contention that an illegal sign or signs are being maintained.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 5, § 9; Code 1933, § 95A-921, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 263, § 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “cataloguing” was substituted for “cataloging” in the first sentence of paragraph (e)(1).

32-6-80.
Renewal of permits for nonconforming signs; transfer of permits for nonconforming signs.

After March 24, 1980, renewal of permits for nonconforming signs as defined in paragraph (12) of Code Section 32-6-71 and as authorized in subsection (e) of Code Section 32-6-79 shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed by the department; shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department’s rules and regulations; and shall be verified under oath by the person, firm, or corporation making the application. Permit renewals shall be issued and shall be valid only if the sign is maintained in accordance with this part during the 12 month period next following the date of issuance. The fee for the renewal of a permit shall be $25.00. The money received from permit fees shall be used to help defray the expenses of administering this part. Upon receipt of a properly executed application and the appropriate fee for the maintenance of a sign which may be lawfully maintained pursuant to this part, the department shall, within 60 days, issue a permit renewal authorizing the maintenance of the sign for which application is made. Application for the renewal of a permit shall be made to the department not more than 90 days nor less than 60 days before the expiration date of the permit for which renewal is sought. If the department fails to receive the renewal application before the expiration date of the permit, the department will notify the applicant that the renewal application is overdue when the applicant’s address is known or reasonably available to the department and shall give the applicant 30 days after the expiration date to send the department the renewal application. If the applicant does not send the properly executed application and the appropriate fee within the specified 30 day period, the sign shall then become an illegal sign. No permit shall be renewed if the application for the renewal thereof has not been made in accordance with this Code section.

Permits shall be transferable. An application to have the permit transferred shall be made within 30 days of the change in ownership of the sign; shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed by the department; shall contain the signature of the applicant and such other information as may be required by the department; and shall be verified under oath by the person, firm, or corporation making application for transfer. Failure to comply in a timely and proper manner with this subsection shall be grounds for revocation of the permit.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-922, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1017, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.